src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON NUORTTALABBO   !!= @CODE@ Inherent comparatives, gives both comp and superl. Most of the words are the compared forms of -el(a) words, like nuorttal, lullel.

                                             +Gram/Comp:ap%>        ATTR            ;
                      			      +Use/NG+Gram/Comp:up%>        ATTR            ;
                                             +Gram/Comp:            ABBO            ;
                                     +Der1+Der/Superl+A:            AMOS            ;
	     
                     +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:appu»sj%>   K-CONS          ;
                            +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:appu»sj%>   ATTR            ;
                            +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:appu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ;
          +Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:appu»tj%>it K-CONS          ;
                           +Gram/Comp+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:appo%>t     K-CONS          ;
                   +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:abmus%>it   K-CONS          ;
														     
            +Err/Orth+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Der1+Der/Comp+A:æppo%>t     K-CONS          ; !
          +Err/Orth+Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ebmus%>it   K-CONS          ; !
            +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:eppu»sj%>   K-CONS          ; !
            +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:uppu»sj%>   K-CONS          ;
                   +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:eppu»sj%>   ATTR            ; !
                   +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:uppu»sj%>   ATTR            ;
                   +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:eppu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ; !
                   +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:uppu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ;
 +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:eppu»tj%>it K-CONS          ; !
 +Err/Orth+Gram/Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:uppu»tj%>it K-CONS          ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: guddnelabbo # Even-syllable test
!!€ guddnelabbo:           guddnelabbo+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ guddnelamos:           guddnelabbo+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ guddnelap:             guddnelabbo+A+Attr
!!€ guddnelup:             guddnelabbo+A+Attr

LEXICON GASSKALAMOS   !!= @CODE@ Inherent superlatives, gives onlys superl. Words that are lexicalized in their superlative forms. 
                   +Gram/Superl:%>            AMOS    ;
 +Gram/Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>abmus%>it   K-CONS  ;







!!€gt-norm: ájtodamos # Even-syllable test
!!€ ájtodamos:           ájtodamos+A+Sg+Nom


!! ## Contracted stems
! ----------------

LEXICON SÁDNES !!= @CODE@  Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: sáddnáv, Attr: sádnes.
                        :%>Q1s ATTR              ;
                 +Sg+Nom:%>Q1s K-CONS            ;
                        :%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        :%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4  PxV               ; !
                    +Ess:%>X4n K-CONS            ;
                        :%>X4  BU/MUS            ;
      +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4t K-CONS            ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4  R                 ;
              +Cmp/PlGen:%>X4j R                 ;

!!€gt-norm: hávres # Contracted test
!!€ hávres:                 hávres+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ hávrráv:                hávres+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ hávres:                 hávres+A+Attr
!!€ hávrráp:                hávres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 



LEXICON GOAVSOS  !!= @CODE@ Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: goaksuv, Attr: goavsos.(goavsos is so far the only word in this lexicon)
                        :%>Q3s ATTR              ;
                 +Sg+Nom:%>Q3s K-CONS            ;
                        :%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        :%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4  PxV               ; !
                    +Ess:%>X4n K-CONS            ;
                        :%>X4  BU/MUS            ;
      +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4t K-CONS            ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4  R                 ;
              +Cmp/PlGen:%>X4j R                 ;

!!€gt-norm: goavsos # Contracted test
!!€ goavsos:                 goavsos+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ goaksuv:                 goavsos+A+Sg+Acc 
!!€ goaksusav:               goavsos+A+Sg+Acc # From lexicon TJIEGOS
!!€ goavsos:                 goavsos+A+Attr
!!€ goaksup:                 goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
!!€ goaksusabbo:             goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom  # from lexicon TJIEGOS

LEXICON SUVRES  !!= @CODE@ Sg Acc: suvrráv, Attr: suvra.
                        :a%>Q1  ATTR              ;
                        :e%>Q1s VUOHTA            ;
                 +Sg+Nom:e%>Q1s K-CONS            ;
                        :á%>    ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        :á%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:á%>    PxV               ; !
                    +Ess:á%>n   K-CONS            ;
                        :á%>    BU/MUS            ;
      +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:á%>t   K-CONS            ;
              +Cmp/SgNom:e%>Q1s R                 ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:á%>    R                 ;
              +Cmp/PlGen:á%>j   R                 ;

!!€gt-norm: suvres # Contracted test
!!€ suvres:                  suvres+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ suvrráv:                 suvres+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ suvrrásav:               suvres+A+Sg+Acc # From lexicon SJÆVNNJAT
!!€ suvra:                   suvres+A+Attr
!!€ suvrráp:                 suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 
!!€ suvrrásabbo:             suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom  # from LINES

LEXICON GÅLMAKTES !!= @CODE@  Attr same as pred. without cg but with vowel changes. Sg Acc: gålmaktáv, Attr: gålmaktes. VIEKSES makes odd-syll same thing. 
                        :%>s   ATTR              ;
                 +Sg+Nom:%>s   K-CONS            ;
                        :%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        :%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4  PxV               ; !
                    +Ess:%>X4n K-CONS            ;
                        :%>X4  BU/MUS            ;
      +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4t K-CONS            ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4  R                 ;
              +Cmp/PlGen:%>X4j R                 ;



!! ----


!! # Comparation

LEXICON BU/MUS !!= @CODE@  comparison for even-syll adjectives. Also derivates diminutive and adverbs from the comparisions.
                                 +Der1+Der/Comp+A:           BUStem       ;
                               +Der1+Der/Superl+A:muss       BUOREMUS     ;
               +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:but        K-CONS       ;
             +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:musá%>t    K-CONS       ;
           +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:bu»sj%>    K-CONS       ;
               +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:bu»sj%>    ATTR         ;
                  +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:bu»ttja%>  CompSup-EVEN ;
+Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:bu»dtja%>  CompSup-EVEN ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:bu»ttja%>t K-CONS       ;
