src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
badjelabbo+A:badjel NUORTTALABBO ;
dárbbahabbo+A:dárbbah NUORTTALABBO ;
ferjjodahkes+A:ferjjodahkke SÁDNES ;
gasskalamos+A:gasskal GASSKALAMOS ; !lexicalized
gatjádahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gatjádahkke SÁDNES ;
goavsos+A:goaksu GOAVSOS ;
guddnelabbo+A:guddnel NUORTTALABBO ;
guobastahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guobastahkke SÁDNES ;
guovddelabbo+A:guovddel NUORTTALABBO ;
gájkviekses+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gájk#viekse GÅLMAKTES ;
gålmaktes+A:gålmakte GÅLMAKTES ;
gåssådahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåssådahkke SÁDNES ;
hiebadahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hiebadahkke SÁDNES ;
hálmes+A:hálmme SÁDNES ;
hávres+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hávrre SÁDNES ;
jaskadabbo+A:jaskad NUORTTALABBO ;
lullelabbo+A:lullel NUORTTALABBO ;
mihástahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mihástahkke SÁDNES ;
målsudahkes+A:målsudahkke SÁDNES ;
niskudahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:niskudahkke SÁDNES ;
nuorttalabbo+A:nuorttal NUORTTALABBO ;
oarjjelabbo+A:oarjjel NUORTTALABBO ;
skieges+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skiehke SÁDNES ;
stuores+v2+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuorre SÁDNES ;
suvres+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suvrr SUVRES ;
sádnes+A:sáddne SÁDNES ;
sáltes+A:sállte SÁDNES ;
såbadahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:såbadahkke SÁDNES ;
såjådahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:såjådahkke SÁDNES ;
tjuottjes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuodtje SÁDNES ;
vajáldahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vajáldahkke SÁDNES ;
viehkedahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viehkedahkke SÁDNES ;
viekses+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viekse GÅLMAKTES ;
vijses+v1+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vijsse SÁDNES ;
vájbadahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vájbadahkke SÁDNES ;
ájtodamos+A:ájtod GASSKALAMOS ;
ållusabbo+A:ållus NUORTTALABBO ;
æjgádahkes+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:æjgádahkke SÁDNES ;
